California statutes. Education Code
(a) Before auditing, or causing to be audited, the records of a public agency pursuant to Section 22206, the board shall provide written notice of the intended audit to the affected public agency as well as to the exclusive representative or representatives, if any, of members that may be affected by the audit, and this notice shall apprise the public agency and the exclusive representative or representatives, if any, of the purpose and scope of the intended audit. For purposes of carrying out the provisions of this section and Section 22206.2, the public agency shall be responsible for providing the board with the name and contact information for all applicable exclusive representatives.

(b) An audited public agency shall cooperate in good faith with the board and provide all information requested by the board in a timely manner. The public agency, at the time it provides information to the board, shall also provide all the information to the exclusive representative or representatives, if any, of the members affected by the audit.

(c) An audited public agency and the exclusive representative or representatives, if any, of the members affected by the audit may provide the board with additional information relevant to the audit, and the board shall consider this information in preparing its audit findings.

(d) Prior to issuing its final audit report, the board shall provide to the audited public agency
 and to the exclusive representative or representatives, if any, of the members affected by the audit, the preliminary audit findings, the statutes being addressed by the audit, and a list of every member then known by the board to be affected by the audit. Within a period to be specified by the board, which shall not be less than 60 days, the recipients may provide the board their written responses to the preliminary audit findings and the board shall consider their responses in preparing its final audit report.

(e) Within a period specified by the board of not less than 60 days, the public agency shall provide the board and the exclusive representative a list of the names of any members affected by the audit not included in the list provided by the board
 pursuant to subdivision (d).

(f) Except as provided in this section, this section does not confer additional rights upon the exclusive representative, including, but not limited to, due process rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 754, Sec. 2.   (AB 1667)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22206.2.

(a) The board shall provide the final audit report to the public agency audited pursuant to Section 22206 and to the exclusive representative or representatives, if any, of the members affected by the audit, and shall provide the audited public agency with an explanation of its appeal rights pursuant to Section 22206.3.

(b) Following the notification by the public agency of the members affected by the audit pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 22206.1, the board shall provide the final audit report, with an explanation of appeal rights pursuant to Section 22206.4, to each member affected by the audit.

(c) If a member is later known to have been affected by an audit, the board shall provide a copy of the final audit report and an explanation of appeal rights pursuant to Section 22206.4 to that member or former member, or their beneficiaries if the member or former member is deceased. 

(d) Except as provided in this section, this section does not confer additional rights upon the exclusive representative, including, but not limited to, due process rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 754, Sec. 3.   (AB 1667)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22206.3.

(a) If the public agency audited pursuant to Section 22206 disagrees with the final audit report, it may request an administrative hearing pursuant to Section 22219. The request shall be made in writing and be mailed or emailed to the address identified in the final audit report within 90 days of the board’s transmission of the final audit report to the public agency as provided in Section 22206.2. 

(b) If the audited public agency fails to request an administrative hearing within the time provided in subdivision (a), the right to an administrative hearing shall be deemed waived, and the findings of the final audit report shall be deemed the board’s final
 determination as to that public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 754, Sec. 4.   (AB 1667)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22206.4.

(a) If a member affected by an audit disagrees with the final audit report, the member may request an administrative hearing pursuant to Section 22219. The request shall be made in writing and be mailed or emailed to the designated address identified in the final audit report within 90 days of the board’s transmission of the final audit report to the member, as provided in Section 22206.2. 

(b) If a member affected by the audit fails to request an administrative hearing within the
 time provided in subdivision (a), the member’s right to an administrative hearing shall be deemed waived, and the findings of the final audit report shall be deemed the board’s final determination as to that member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 754, Sec. 5.   (AB 1667)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22206.5.

The system shall make all final employer audit reports available on its internet website. Personal information regarding members shall be excluded to the extent necessary to protect their privacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 754, Sec. 6.   (AB 1667)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22207.

The board shall perform any other acts necessary for the administration of the system and the plan in carrying into effect the provisions of this part and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000), which may include, but shall not be limited to, requesting the following information from a member, participant, or beneficiary:

(a) Financial statements, certified copies of state and federal income tax records, or evidence of financial status.

(b) Employment, legal, or medical documentation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 323, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

22208.

The board may appoint a committee of two or more of its members to perform any act within the power of the board itself to perform. The board may also delegate authority to the chief executive officer to perform any such act. Except where the board, in delegating that authority, provides that the committee or the chief executive officer may act finally, all acts of the committee or the chief executive officer shall be reported to the board at its next regular meeting and shall be subject to review, ratification, or reversal by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22209.

The office of chief executive officer shall be filled by appointment by the board and the appointee shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22210.

(a) Reversal by the board of any act of the committee or the chief executive officer shall be effective on the date fixed by the board.

(b) Payment of benefits prior to the board’s action of reversal may not be affected by such an action, except for the recovery of the amounts paid, from the beneficiary receiving the amounts, as the board may direct.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22212.

The board shall appoint such employees as are necessary to administer the plan and the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22212.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), this section shall apply to the following positions in the system: a chief executive officer, a chief operating officer, a chief financial officer, a system actuary,
 a general counsel, a chief investment officer, and other investment officers and portfolio managers whose positions are designated managerial pursuant to Section 18801.1 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 19825, 19826, 19829, and 19832 of the Government Code, the board shall fix the compensation for the positions specified in subdivision (a). In so doing, the board shall be guided by the principles contained in Sections 19826 and 19829 of the Government Code, consistent with its fiduciary responsibility to its members to recruit and retain highly qualified and effective employees for these positions. The annual percentage increase in salary that may be paid pursuant to this section to a person
 who served as chief financial officer or as chief operating officer on January 1, 2016, and who does not separate from service in that position prior to the date on which the increase is applied, shall not exceed either of the following:

(1) Ten percent for the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(2) Five percent for any fiscal year subsequent to 2017–18.

(c) When a position specified in subdivision (a) is filled through a general civil service appointment, it shall be filled from an eligible list based on an examination that was held on an open basis, and tenure in those positions shall be subject to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 19590) of Chapter 7 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. In addition to
 the causes for action specified in that article, the board may take action under the article for causes related to its fiduciary responsibility to its members, including the employee’s failure to meet specified performance objectives.

(d) An individual who held a position designated in subdivision (a), was a member of the board, or was in a career executive assignment position that reported directly to either the chief executive officer or the chief operating officer, shall not, for a period of two years after leaving that position, for compensation, act as agent or attorney for, or otherwise represent, any other person, except the state, by making any formal or informal appearance before or by making any oral or written communication to the board, or any officer or employee thereof, if the appearance or communication is made for the purpose of
 influencing administrative or legislative action or any action or proceeding involving the issuance, amendment, awarding, or revocation of a permit, license, grant, contract, or sale or purchase of goods or property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 553, Sec. 1.   (AB 736)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22213.

The board shall regulate the duties of employers, employing agencies, and other public authorities, imposed upon them by this part, and shall require reports from employers, employing agencies, and other public authorities, as it deems advisable in connection with the performance of its duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 859, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22214.

The board may take any action it deems necessary to ensure the continued right of members or beneficiaries to receive monthly payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22215.

The board shall determine the service performed by members to be credited toward qualification for retirement, and shall fix and modify allowances provided under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22216.

(a) The board shall annually adopt as a plan amendment with respect to the Defined Benefit Program the rate of credited interest to be credited to members’ accumulated retirement contributions for service performed after June 30, 1935, and the accumulated annuity deposit contributions excluding all accumulated contributions while being paid as disability allowances, family allowances, and retirement allowances.

(b) The board shall credit interest to all other accumulated reserves at the actuarially assumed interest rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22217.

(a) The board shall employ a certified public accountant or public accountant, who is not in public employment, to audit the financial statements of the system. The costs of the audit shall be paid from the income of the retirement fund. The audit shall be made annually and the audit report shall be incorporated into the annual report filed with the Governor and the Legislature pursuant to Section 22324.

(b) These audits shall not be duplicated by the Department of Finance or the State Auditor. The system shall be exempt from a pro rata general administrative charge for auditing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 654, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22218.

The board shall establish and maintain records and accounts following recognized accounting principles and controls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22219.

(a) The board may in its discretion hold a hearing for the purpose of determining any question presented to it involving any right, benefit, or obligation of a person under this part.

(b) When a hearing is held, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, relating to administrative adjudication, and the board shall have all of the powers granted in that chapter. However, the provisions of Section 11508 of the Government Code relating to the location of the hearing shall not apply, and the hearing shall be held at the time and place determined by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22220.

In addition to the authority granted pursuant to Section 11181 of the Government Code, the board may subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance to testify before it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 864, Sec. 3.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

22221.

The board shall adopt, upon the recommendation of the actuary of the system, any mortality and other tables and interest rates necessary to do the following:

(a) Permit valuation of the assets and liabilities of the system.

(b) Make any determination or calculation necessary to carry out this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22222.

The board may adjust the amounts of the death payments based on changes in the All Urban California Consumer Price Index, and shall adopt as a plan amendment with respect to the Defined Benefit Program any adjusted amount, provided that the most recent actuarial valuation report indicates that the adjustment would not increase the normal cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22223.

The members of the board who are not active members of the Defined Benefit Program or active participants of the Cash Balance Benefit Program and who are appointed by the Governor pursuant to Section 22200 shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for every day of actual attendance at meetings of the board or any meeting of any committee of the board of which the person is a member, and that is conducted for the purpose of carrying out the powers and duties of the board, together with their necessary traveling expenses incurred in connection with performance of their official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 351, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22224.

Members of the Defined Benefit Program and participants of the Cash Balance Benefit Program, who are either elected to the board or appointed to the board by the Governor pursuant to Section 22200, or who are appointed by the board to serve on a committee or subcommittee of the board or a panel of the system, shall be granted, by his or her employer, sufficient time away from regular duties, without loss of compensation or other benefits to which the person is entitled by reason of employment, to attend meetings of the board or any of its committees or subcommittees of which the person is a member, or to serve as a member of a panel of the system, and to attend to the duties expected to be performed by the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 11, Sec. 2.   Effective January 28, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22225.

(a) The compensation of the members of the Defined Benefit Program and participants of the Cash Balance Benefit Program who are either elected to the board or appointed to the board by the Governor pursuant to Section 22200, or who are appointed by the board to a committee or subcommittee, or to a panel of the system, may not be reduced by his or her employer for any absence from service occasioned by attendance upon the business of the board, pursuant to Section 22224.

(b) Each employer that employs either a member of the Defined Benefit Program or a participant of the Cash Balance Benefit Program elected or appointed pursuant to Section 22224 and that employs a person to replace the member or participant during attendance at meetings of the board, its committees or subcommittees, or when serving as a member of a panel of the system, or when carrying out other duties approved by the board, shall be reimbursed from the retirement fund for the cost incurred by employing a replacement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 11, Sec. 3.   Effective January 28, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22226.

(a) The board shall conduct a study on providing health insurance benefits, including vision and dental care benefits, for active, disabled, and retired members, beneficiaries, children, and dependent parents. The health insurance may include vision and dental care. 

(b) The study shall include, but not be limited to, assessing the lack of access of health insurance benefits for retired teachers and shall evaluate the following:

(1) The demand for health insurance benefits.

(2) The integration of health insurance benefits and Medicare coverage.

(3) The manner in which health insurance benefits would be administered and provided.

(c) There is hereby appropriated from the Teachers’ Retirement Fund to the State Teachers’ Retirement Board the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) conduct a study for the purposes identified in this section. If this study results in the implementation of health insurance benefits as described in subdivision (a), the State Teachers’ Retirement Board shall reimburse the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund from administrative fees charged to recipients of the health insurance benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22227.

It is the intent of the Legislature that candidates for board seats described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 22200, including incumbent board members running for reelection, shall file campaign statements with the Secretary of State according to campaign reporting, contribution limits, and conflict of interest provisions of the Political Reform Act, adapted for the unique characteristics of elected member seats on state retirement system boards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 11, Sec. 4.   Effective January 28, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22228.

(a) Commencing March 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the board shall submit a report to the Legislature on the status of achieving appropriate objectives and initiatives, as defined by the board, regarding participation of emerging or diverse managers responsible for asset management within its portfolio of investments. The report shall be based on contracts that the system enters into on and after January 1, 2022.

(b) The report shall also identify and include both of the following:

(1) The name of each emerging or diverse manager providing investment portfolio or asset management services at the end of the prior
 fiscal year, including, but not limited to, fund of funds contracts, for all asset classes, as applicable. The board shall also report the year the emerging or diverse manager was first engaged or contracted to provide investment portfolio or asset management services.

(2) The amount managed by each emerging or diverse manager by asset class at the end of the prior fiscal year, as well as the total amount allocated by the system in the applicable asset class during the year and the total amount of the asset class in the system’s investment portfolio.

(c) The board shall define the term “emerging manager” and “diverse manager” for purposes of this section.

(d) The report required by this section shall be submitted in compliance
 with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) Nothing in this section shall require the board to take action
 unless the board determines in good faith that the action described in this section is consistent with the fiduciary responsibilities of the board as described in Section 17 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(f) This section shall not require the board to disclose information that is excepted from disclosure under Section 7928.710 of the Government Code.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 32.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Fiduciary Duties [22250. - 22261.]

22250.

The board and its officers and employees of the system shall discharge their duties with respect to the system and the plan solely in the interest of the members and beneficiaries of the Defined Benefit Program as well as the participants and beneficiaries of the Cash Balance Benefit Program as follows:

(a) For the exclusive purpose of the following:

(1) Providing benefits to members and beneficiaries of the Defined Benefit Program as well as the participants and beneficiaries of the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(2) Defraying reasonable expenses of administering the plan.

(b) With the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with those matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims.

(c) By diversifying the investments of the plan so as to minimize the risk of large losses, unless under the circumstances it is clearly prudent not to do so.

(d) In accordance with the documents and instruments governing the plan and the system insofar as those documents and instruments are consistent with this part and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22251.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the assets of the plan shall never inure to the benefit of an employer and shall be held for the exclusive purposes of providing benefits to members and beneficiaries of the Defined Benefit Program as well as the participants and beneficiaries of the Cash Balance Benefit Program and defraying reasonable expenses of administering the plan and the system.

(b) In the case of a contribution that is made by an employer by a mistake of fact, subdivision (a) shall not prohibit the return of that contribution within one year after the system knows, or should know in the ordinary course of business, that the contribution was made by a mistake of fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22252.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the board and its officers and employees of the system shall not cause the system to engage in a transaction if they know or should know that the transaction constitutes a direct or indirect:

(a) Sale or exchange, or leasing, of any property from the system to a member or beneficiary of the Defined Benefit Program, as well as a participant or beneficiary of the Cash Balance Benefit Program, for less than adequate consideration, or from a member or beneficiary of the Defined Benefit Program, as well as a participant or beneficiary of the Cash Balance Benefit Program, to the system for more than adequate consideration.

(b) Lending of money or other extension of credit from the system to a member or beneficiary of the Defined Benefit Program, as well as a participant or beneficiary of the Cash Balance Benefit Program, without the receipt of adequate security and a reasonable rate of interest, or from a member or beneficiary of the Defined Benefit Program, as well as a participant or beneficiary of the Cash Balance Benefit Program, with the provision of excessive security or an unreasonably high rate of interest.

(c) Furnishing of goods, services, or facilities from the system to a member or beneficiary of the Defined Benefit Program, as well as a participant or beneficiary of the Cash Balance Benefit Program, for less than adequate consideration, or from a member, or beneficiary of the Defined Benefit Program, as well as a participant or beneficiary of the Cash Balance Benefit Program, to the system for more than adequate consideration.

(d) Transfer to, or use by or for the benefit of, a member or beneficiary of the Defined Benefit Program, as well as a participant or beneficiary of the Cash Balance Benefit Program, of any assets of the plan for less than adequate consideration.

(e) Acquisition, on behalf of the system, of any employer security, real property, or loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22253.

The board and its officers and employees of the system shall not do any of the following:

(a) Deal with the assets of the plan and the system in their own interest or for their own account.

(b) In their individual or in any other capacity, act in any transaction involving the system on behalf of a party, or represent a party, whose interests are adverse to the interests of the plan or the interests of the members and beneficiaries of the Defined Benefit Program, as well as participants and beneficiaries of the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(c) Receive any consideration for their personal account from any party conducting business with the system in connection with a transaction involving the assets of the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22254.

(a) Any board member or officer who breaches any of the responsibilities, obligations, or duties imposed upon them by Section 22251, 22252, or 22253 shall be personally liable to make restitution to the retirement fund for any losses to it resulting from each breach, and to restore any profits that have been made through use of assets of the fund and shall be subject to any other equitable or remedial relief the court may deem appropriate, including removal from the board.

(b) No board member or officer shall be liable with respect to a breach of fiduciary duty under this part if the breach was committed before the board member or officer became one, or ceased to be one.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22255.

(a) No board member or officer shall be personally liable for the breach of a fiduciary duty except as set forth in Section 22254 or 22256. This subdivision shall apply only to causes of actions arising on or after January 1, 1990.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to lessen the scope of liability of board members or employees of the system for gross negligence or fraud in the investment of the retirement fund assets, nor to lessen the scope of liability of the board or system for breach of fiduciary duty pertaining to the administration of the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22256.

A board member or officer shall be liable for a breach of fiduciary responsibility of another board member or officer with respect to the system in the following circumstances:

(a) If the board member or officer knowingly participates in, or knowingly undertakes to conceal an act or omission of the other board member or officer knowing that the act or omission is a breach.

(b) If the board member’s or officer’s failure to comply with his or her responsibilities as set forth in Section 22251, 22252, or 22253 has enabled another board member or officer to commit a breach.

(c) If the board member or officer has knowledge of a breach unless the board member or officer makes reasonable efforts under the circumstances to remedy the breach.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22257.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 22203, the board may contract with or appoint one or more investment managers to manage the assets of the retirement fund. If the board has acted with care, skill, prudence, and diligence in meeting the requirements of Sections 22252 and 22253 in selecting and monitoring the investment managers, then, notwithstanding Sections 22250, 22252, 22253, 22254, and 22256, no board member shall be liable for the acts or omissions of the investment managers or be under any obligation to invest or otherwise manage any assets of the retirement fund that are subject to the management of the investment managers.

(b) Incorporation of the fiduciary duty set forth in Section 22250 into the terms of a contract between the system and an investment manager shall be admissible as evidence that the board has acted with care, skill, prudence, and diligence in the selection of the investment manager.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22258.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, from the retirement fund to the board, the amount necessary to pay for any insurance obtained pursuant to Section 7511 of the Government Code. These payments shall be made upon warrants drawn by the Controller upon demands made by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22259.

(a) All board members and officers and employees of the system shall execute a fidelity bond, in an amount determined by the board to be prudent, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the board member or employee.

(b) All board members and officers and all staff of the investment division who are authorized to invest funds shall be covered with fiduciary liability insurance in an amount determined by the board to be prudent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22260.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the system may provide credit enhancement for bonds, notes, certificates of participation, or other evidences of indebtedness of an employer, provided that any credit enhancement transaction satisfies the requirement of Section 22250 and does not constitute a prohibited transaction for purposes of Section 503 of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1076, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22261.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may make investments related to the planning, development, or acquisition of surplus real property owned by an employer, if the investment satisfies the requirements of Section 22250 and does not constitute a prohibited transaction for purposes of Section 503 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 903, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Administration [22300. - 22338.]

22300.

The chief executive officer is the chief administrative officer of the system. The chief executive officer may administer oaths.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22301.

The chief executive officer has the authority and responsibility for the administration of the system and the plan pursuant to the policies and rules adopted by the board. The chief executive officer may delegate to his or her subordinates any act or duty unless the board by motion or resolution recorded in its minutes has required the chief executive officer to act personally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22302.

(a) The board shall establish an ombudsperson position to serve as an advocate for the members of the Defined Benefit Program and participants of the Cash Balance Benefit Program. The duties of the ombudsperson position shall include reviewing and making recommendations to the chief executive officer regarding complaints by school employees, members, employee organizations, the Legislature, or the public regarding actions of the employees of the system.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the salary of the position of ombudsperson be offset, as much as possible, through savings realized from a reduction in interest payments on delinquent benefits to members, and through a more efficient and improved public relations
 program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 186, Sec. 2.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22302.5.

The board may contract with a qualified third-party administrator for custodial, record keeping, or other administrative services necessary to carry into effect the provisions of Chapter 38 (commencing with Section 25000) of this part or Part 14.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 22302 (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 13.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22303.

(a) Due to an increase in the demand for retirement counseling services, the system, notwithstanding any other provision of law, may contract with a county superintendent or other employer to provide retirement counseling. Retired public employees may be employed on a part-time basis for that purpose, unless and until the study required by subdivision (b) of Section 7 of Chapter 1532 of the Statutes of 1985 recommends against the employment of retired public employees for these purposes. This authorization is subject to the availability of funds appropriated for that purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(b) The board may, by resolution, designate one or more official representatives who provide retirement counseling pursuant
 to subdivision (a), or as an employee of the system, to receive documents submitted pursuant to this part, Part 13.5 (commencing with Section 25900), or Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any document received by a designated system representative during regular counseling office business hours or in the course of performing counseling services pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed to have been received by the system’s headquarters office on the date received by the officially designated system representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 6.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

22303.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall offer a midcareer retirement information program for the benefit of all members to enhance awareness of the features and benefits of the Defined Benefit Program, services of the system, federal Social Security Act programs and benefits as they apply to members, and personal planning responsibilities. This information shall be provided to assist members in understanding the importance of financial, legal, estate, and personal planning, and how choices and options offered by the system may affect retirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 1.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

22304.

(a) The costs of administration of the plan shall be paid from the retirement fund and those costs may not exceed the amount made available by law during any fiscal period.

(b) The administrative costs of the plan shall be divided proportionately in accordance with the assets of the Defined Benefit Program, the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, and the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22305.

Any rules and regulations adopted by the board for the purpose of the administration of this part and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000), and not inconsistent with this part and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000), have the force and effect of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22306.

(a) Information filed with the system by a member, participant, or beneficiary of the plan is confidential and shall be used by the system for the sole purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of this part, Part 13.5 (commencing with Section 25900), and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000). No official or employee of the system who has access to the individual records of a member, participant, or beneficiary shall divulge any confidential information concerning those records to any person except in the following instances:

(1) To the member, participant, or beneficiary to whom the information relates.

(2) To the authorized representative of the member, participant, or beneficiary.

(3) To the governing board of the member’s or participant’s current or former employer.

(4) To any department, agency, or political subdivision of this state.

(5) To other individuals or entities as necessary to validate personal information of members, participants, and beneficiaries.

(6) Pursuant to subpoena.

(7) To an agent or a physician authorized by the board in the performance of duties pursuant to Section 24003, 24012, 24103, or 24111.
